Tennessee, session 114, SB2708.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 107 of the Private Acts of 1957, as amended by Chapter 2 of the
Private Acts of 1987, Chapter 63 of the Private Acts of 1993, and Chapter 144 of the Private
Acts of 1998, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting subsection (k) in
Section 7 and substituting instead:
(k) to sell or lease to others any real or personal properties which the Hospital
District owns or operates; provided, however, that the Board of Trustees shall not have
the power to sell any real property owned or operated by the Hospital District and shall
not have the power to lease substantially all of the facilities owned or operated by the
Hospital District to one (1) or more other entities in a single transaction or a series of
related transactions without approval of the Williamson County Board of Commissioners;
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of Williamson County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by
the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
SB2708
012069
- 1 -